Florida, session 2026, SB472.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 37 38 Section 1.âSection 624.3154, Florida Statutes, is created 39 to read: 40 624.3154âTariffs Result in Untimely Money Problems (TRUMP) 41 Trust Fund.â 42 (1)âThe Legislature finds it necessary to respond to the 43 economic impact of federal policies that have resulted in record 44 increases in the cost of construction materials. 45 (2)âThere is created within the Department of Financial 46 Services the Tariffs Result in Untimely Money Problems (TRUMP) 47 Trust Fund, which shall provide financial assistance to 48 homeowners to offset increased repair and rebuilding costs 49 resulting from tariffs. 50 (3)âThe trust fund shall consist of $500 million drawn from 51 unallocated general revenue. 52 (4)âIn accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State 53 Constitution, the trust fund shall, unless terminated sooner, be 54 terminated on July 1, 2030. Before its scheduled termination, 55 the trust fund shall be reviewed as provided in s. 215.3206(1). 56 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.